Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 1. Powers and Duties of Regulatory Commission of Alaska.

Sec. 42.06.055.
Commission decision-making procedures.

The commission shall comply with AS

42.04.080

for matters that come before the commission for decision.

History.

(§ 16 ch 25 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Secs. 42.06.060 — 42.60.120.
Alaska Pipeline Commission. [Repealed, § 20 ch 110 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 42.06.130.
[Renumbered as AS 42.06.605.]

Sec. 42.06.140.
General powers and duties.

The commission

shall regulate pipelines and pipeline carriers in the state;

may investigate upon complaint or its own motion, the rates, classifications, rules, regulations, prices, services, practices, and facilities of pipeline carriers, and the performance of obligations under and compliance with the terms of leases issued by the state;

may make, prescribe, or require just, fair, and reasonable rates, classifications, regulations, practices, services, and facilities for pipeline carriers;

may require pipeline carriers and affiliated interests to file with the commission reports and other information and data required or permitted to be required by other provisions of this chapter;

may adopt regulations that are necessary and proper to the performance of its duties under this chapter, including regulations governing practices and procedures of the commission; the regulations may not be inconsistent with state law;

shall during normal business hours have access to and may designate any of its employees, agents, or consultants to inspect and examine the accounts, financial and property records, books, maps, inventories, appraisals, valuations, and related reports kept by a pipeline carrier, or kept for it by others, that directly affect the interests of the state and directly relate to pipelines located in the state;

may initiate, intervene in, and appear personally or by counsel and offer evidence in and participate in, any proceedings involving a pipeline carrier and affecting the interests of the state, before any officer, department, board, commission, or court of this state;

shall require permits for the construction, enlargement in size or operating capacity, extension, connection and interconnection, operation or abandonment of any oil or gas pipeline facility or facilities, subject to necessary and reasonable terms, conditions and limitations;

may prescribe the system of accounts and regulate the service of an oil or gas pipeline facility;

shall provide all reasonable assistance to the Department of Law in intervening in, offering evidence in, and participating in proceedings involving a pipeline carrier or affiliated interest and affecting the interests of the state, before an officer, department, board, commission, or court of another state or the United States.

The commission may assign a qualified, unbiased, and impartial administrative law judge, with experience in the general practice of law, to conduct hearings under this chapter. The administrative law judge may perform other duties in connection with the administration of this chapter and other laws. An administrative law judge hired to conduct hearings under this chapter shall have been admitted to practice law for at least five years immediately before appointment under this subsection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 2 ch 201 SLA 1976; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 35 SLA 1977; am § 6 ch 110 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as AS 42.05.121(c).
Renumbered in 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For applicability, see 3 AAC 47, art. 1.

For regulatory cost charges for regulated public utilities and pipeline carriers, see 3 AAC 47, art. 2.

For regulatory cost charges for exempt utilities, see 3 AAC 47, art. 3.

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

For utility and pipeline tariffs, see 3 AAC 48, art. 2.

For applications generally, see 3 AAC 48, art. 4.

Sec. 42.06.150.
Powers and duties with respect to federally regulated carriers.

AS

42.06.140

applies to oil and gas pipeline carriers regulated under federal law only to the extent not preempted by federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 9 ch 110 SLA 1981)

Secs. 42.06.160 — 42.06.200.
Administrative authority and procedures. [Repealed, § 20 ch 110 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 42.06.210.
Publication of reports, orders, decisions, and regulations.

All reports, orders, decisions, and regulations of the commission shall be in writing.
The commission shall apprise all affected operators of oil or gas pipeline facilities and interested parties of these reports, orders, decisions, and regulations as they are issued and adopted, and, when appropriate to do so, publish them in a manner that will reasonably inform the public or the affected consumers of the services of any oil or gas pipeline facility.
The commission may set charges for costs of printing or reproducing and furnishing copies of its reports, orders, decisions, and regulations.
The publication requirement, as it pertains to regulations, does not supersede the requirements of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For practice before the commission, see 3 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 42.06.220.
Annual report.

The commission shall, by November 15 of each year, publish an annual report reviewing its activities during the previous fiscal year and notify the legislature that the report is available. The report must address the regulation of oil and gas pipeline facilities in the state as of June 30 and must contain details about the commission’s compliance with performance measures reported by the commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 81 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 37 SLA 2007)

Sec. 42.06.230.
Jurisdiction of commission.

Except as to jurisdiction of the Department of Law as provided by AS

42.06.140(a)(10)

, the jurisdiction and authority over the subject matter of this chapter is exclusively in the commission. To the extent that the performance of any duties of the commission affects a pipeline carrier or a pipeline subject to regulation under federal law, the performance of its duties may not, as to that pipeline carrier or pipeline, conflict with applicable federal laws, regulations, orders, or other requirements.

The commission’s jurisdiction and authority extend to

an oil or gas pipeline facility operating in a municipality, whether home rule or otherwise; if a conflict between a certificate, order, decision, or regulation of the commission and a charter, permit, franchise, ordinance, rule, or regulation of such a local governmental entity occurs, the certificate, order, decision, or regulation of the commission prevails; and

the intrastate transportation of North Slope natural gas through a North Slope natural gas pipeline.

History.

(§ 1 ch 139 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 201 SLA 1976; am § 10 ch 110 SLA 1981; am § 20 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 56 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly AS

42.06.600

.
Renumbered in 1983.